Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.660

Leave sharing program—Created.

The Washington state leave sharing program is hereby created. The purpose of the program is to permit state employees, at no significantly increased cost to the state of providing annual leave, sick leave, or personal holidays, to come to the aid of a fellow state employee who is suffering from or has a relative or household member suffering from an extraordinary or severe illness, injury, impairment, or physical or mental condition; a fellow state employee who is a victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking; a fellow state employee who is sick or temporarily disabled because of pregnancy disability or for the purpose of parental leave; or a fellow state employee who has been called to service in the uniformed services, which has caused or is likely to cause the employee to take leave without pay or terminate his or her employment.

[ 2018 c 39 s 3; 2008 c 36 s 2; 2003 1st sp.s. c 12 s 2; 1996 c 176 s 2; 1990 c 23 s 1; 1989 c 93 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 39: See note following RCW 41.04.650.

Effective date—2008 c 36: See note following RCW 41.04.655.

Effective date—2003 1st sp.s. c 12: See note following RCW 41.04.655.

Severability—1989 c 93: See note following RCW 41.04.650.